Maryland, session 2026, HB1213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
13–203.
(a) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “AFFORDABLE” MEANS THAT HOUSING COSTS DO NOT
EXCEED 30% OF A HOUSEHOLD’S INCOME.
(III) “DEED–RESTRICTED PROPERTY” MEANS MULTIFAMILY
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY THAT IS DEED–RESTRICTED TO INCLUDE 15% OF UNITS
THAT ARE AFFORDABLE TO HOUSEHOLDS EARNING 80% OR LESS OF THE AREA
MEDIAN INCOME.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1213*

HOUSE BILL 1213
(2) Except as provided in subsections (a–1) and (b) of this section, the rate
of the transfer tax is:
(I) FOR SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY:
1. 0.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS LESS THAN $300,000;
2. 0.375% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $300,000 BUT LESS
THAN $400,000;
3. 0.5% of the consideration payable for the instrument of
writing IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $400,000 BUT LESS THAN $650,000;
4. 0.75% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $650,000 BUT LESS
THAN $800,000;
5. 1% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $800,000 BUT LESS
THAN $1,000,000;
6. 1.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $1,000,000 BUT LESS
THAN $3,000,000; AND
7. 1.5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $3,000,000;
(II) FOR DEED–RESTRICTED PROPERTY:
1. 0.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS LESS THAN $1,000,000;
2. 0.375% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $1,000,000 BUT LESS
THAN $10,000,000; AND
3. 0.5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $10,000,000;
(III) FOR MULTIFAMILY RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY OTHER THAN

HOUSE BILL 1213 3
DEED–RESTRICTED PROPERTY:
1. 0.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS LESS THAN $1,000,000;
2. 0.375% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $1,000,000 BUT LESS
THAN $5,000,000;
3. 0.5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $5,000,000 BUT LESS
THAN $10,000,000;
4. 0.75% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $10,000,000 BUT
LESS THAN $20,000,000;
5. 1% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $20,000,000 BUT
LESS THAN $40,000,000; AND
6. 1.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $40,000,000; AND
(IV) FOR NONRESIDENTIAL PROPERTY:
1. 0.375% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS LESS THAN $5,000,000;
2. 0.5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $5,000,000 BUT LESS
THAN $10,000,000;
3. 1% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $10,000,000 BUT
LESS THAN $20,000,000;
4. 1.25% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $20,000,000 BUT
LESS THAN $40,000,000; AND
5. 1.5% OF THE CONSIDERATION PAYABLE FOR THE
INSTRUMENT OF WRITING IF THE CONSIDERATION IS AT LEAST $40,000,000.

HOUSE BILL 1213
[(2)] (3) The consideration:
(i) includes the amount of any mortgage or deed of trust assumed
by the grantee; and
(ii) subject to item (i) of this paragraph, includes only the amount
paid or delivered in return for the sale of the property and does not include the amount of
any debt forgiven or no longer secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the property.
(a–1) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the rate of the
transfer tax is [0.5%] THE APPLICABLE RATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION of the consideration paid for the transfer of a controlling interest in a real
property entity as defined in § 13–103 of this title that has developed real property under
Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, the Low Income Housing Tax Credit Program.
(2) The consideration under this subsection shall be the actual payment
made by the purchaser to the seller for the purchase of the interest.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “first–time Maryland home buyer” means an
individual who has never owned in the State residential real property that has been the
individual’s principal residence.
(2) If there are two or more grantees, this subsection does not apply unless
each grantee is a first–time Maryland home buyer or a co–maker or guarantor of a purchase
money mortgage or purchase money deed of trust as defined in § 12–108(i) of this article
for the property and the co–maker or guarantor will not occupy the residence as the
co–maker’s or guarantor’s principal residence.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a sale of improved
residential real property to a first–time Maryland home buyer who will occupy the property
as a principal residence, the rate of the transfer tax is 0.25% of the consideration payable
for the instrument of writing and the transfer tax shall be paid entirely by the seller.
(4) To qualify for the exemption under paragraph (3) of this subsection,
each grantee or an agent of the grantee shall provide a statement that is signed under oath
by the grantee or agent of the grantee stating that:
(i) 1. the grantee is an individual who has never owned in the
State residential real property that has been the individual’s principal residence; and
2. the residence will be occupied by the grantee as the
grantee’s principal residence; or
(ii) 1. the grantee is a co–maker or guarantor of a purchase
money mortgage or purchase money deed of trust as defined in § 12–108(i) of this article
for the property; and

HOUSE BILL 1213 5
2. the grantee will not occupy the residence as the
co–maker’s or guarantor’s principal residence.
(5) A statement under paragraph (4) of this subsection by an agent of a
grantee shall state that the statement:
(i) is based on a diligent inquiry made by the agent with respect to
the facts set forth in the statement; and
(ii) is true to the best of the knowledge, information, and belief of the
agent.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to instruments of writing recorded on or after July 1, 2026.